Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB610.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 158.060 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Each teacher shall be provided access to a copy of his or her employment contract
upon request.
(2) Twenty (20) school days, or days in which teachers are actually employed in the
schoolroom, shall constitute a school month in the common schools.
(3) (a) Each full-time teacher shall be provided the equivalent of two hundred fifty
(250) minutes of noninstructional planning time each five (5) day school
week, which shall be used at the teacher's discretion and may include but is
not limited to grading, instructional planning, curriculum development, and
outreach activities involving the teacher's students. If a school week does
not contain five (5) instructional days, the required minimum number of
minutes may be reduced proportionally.
(b) Each full-time teacher shall be provided with a duty-free lunch period each
day during the regularly scheduled student lunch period in addition to the
noninstructional planning time described in paragraph (a) of this
subsection. The duty-free lunch period shall be not less than the length of the
lunch period specified in the school calendar approved by the chief state
school officer.
(c) Each full-time teacher shall receive additional compensation of at least his
or her usual hourly rate of pay for all duties assigned during the
noninstructional planning time required by paragraph (a) of this subsection
or duty-free lunch required by paragraph (b) of this subsection. A full-time
teacher may be assigned duties during any[to lunch room duty during the
regularly scheduled student lunch period only for an amount of time equal to
the] noninstructional time in excess of the minimum time required by
Page 1 of 3
XXXX 2/10/2026 1:21 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2127
paragraph (a) of this subsection without additional compensation[fifty-five
(55) minutes included in the teacher's daily schedule].
(d) The calculation of the minimum noninstructional time required by paragraph
(a) of this subsection shall not include the teacher's duty-free lunch period,
the time teachers are required to be at school prior to the start of the student's
instructional day, [or ]the time teachers are required to remain at school after
the students are dismissed, or the time teachers are required to coordinate
and attend a meeting to develop or monitor an individual education plan as
provided in KRS 157.196, unless such time is compensated in accordance
with paragraph (c) of this subsection.
(4) Except for children with disabilities and children attending the primary school
program who may attend a program of less than six (6) hours per day under policy
adopted by the local school district board of education and approved by the
commissioner of education and children attending a school district where the local
board has approved a schedule that provides at least the equivalent of six (6) hours
of daily instruction during the school year, a minimum of six (6) hours of actual
school work shall constitute a school day. Kindergarten programs may be operated
for less than six (6) hours without state board approval. The Kentucky Board of
Education, upon recommendation of the chief state school officer, shall develop and
approve regulations governing make up by school districts of whole days missed
due to emergencies, or partial days missed as a result of shortening regularly
scheduled school days due to emergencies.
(5) (a) Teachers shall be provided additional time and shall receive additional
compensation of at least his or her usual hourly rate of pay for nonteaching
activities required by a school or school district outside of the teacher's
contract hours, including but not limited to[. The nonteaching time shall be
used to provide teachers] opportunities for professional development activities
Page 2 of 3
XXXX 2/10/2026 1:21 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2127
as provided in KRS 156.095,[ instructional planning,] coordination of or
attendance at a meeting to develop or monitor an individual education plan
as provided in KRS 157.196, school-based decision making as provided in
KRS 160.345, [curriculum development, ]and outreach activities involving
their students' families and the community.
(b) A school or school district may require a teacher to remain at school outside
of the teacher's contract hours for up to sixty (60) minutes after the students
are dismissed one (1) day a week with additional compensation of at least
his or her usual hourly rate of pay.
(6) This section shall not be interpreted to:
(a) Limit the ability of a school district to provide teachers noninstructional
time in excess of the minimum required by subsection (3)(a) of this section;
(b) Limit the ability of a school district to compensate teachers for work
performed during noninstructional time or outside of a teacher's contract
hours beyond the teacher's usual hourly rate of pay; or
(c) Reduce any rights of school district employees as set forth in an existing
employer-employee bargained contract.
(7) Character education programs and activities shall be considered valuable and
legitimate components of the actual school work constituting a school day under
subsection (4) of this section.
Page 3 of 3
XXXX 2/10/2026 1:21 PM Jacketed